Georgia statutes. 
(3) The costs of obtaining and maintaining newly constructed or rehabilitated housing within the geographic boundaries of the municipality activating the authority, including considerations of the total rehabilitation costs of such housing and the costs of financing such housing as affected by prevailing and available financing terms and conditions relating to nonfederally aided and nonstate aided mortgages; and

(4) The age or physical condition of the persons who intend to reside in the residential housing.

(d) The administrative guidelines established by each authority pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section may differ in order to reflect the varying tenant composition and economic and housing conditions within the jurisdiction of each authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 556, §§ 4-6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 947, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1530, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 36; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, "others" was substituted for "other" in the introductory language of subsection (c).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, "Bank" was inserted following "Federal Intermediate Credit" in subparagraph (a)(13)(C).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "and" was deleted at the end of paragraph (a)(21).

36-41-6. Loans to qualified housing sponsors or eligible households; loans to lending institutions.

Statute text

(a) With respect to the power to make loans set forth in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-41-5, each authority may make loans to qualified housing sponsors or eligible households for the financing, acquisition, or rehabilitation of residential housing within the geographic boundaries of the large municipality activating the authority. Any such loan:

(1) Shall be used for all or part of the cost of financing, acquiring, or rehabilitating residential housing, including the construction of residential housing, in accordance with the rules of the authority; and

(2) Shall be secured in such manner and be repaid in such period, not exceeding 40 years, as may be determined by the authority and shall bear interest at a rate determined by the authority.

(b) Each authority may make and contract to make loans to lending institutions, on such terms and conditions as it shall determine, in accordance with the following criteria, and all lending institutions are authorized to borrow from the authority in accordance with administrative guidelines of the authority established pursuant to the following criteria:

(1) The authority shall require that each lending institution receiving a loan pursuant to this subsection shall issue and deliver to the authority evidence of its indebtedness to the authority, which shall constitute a general obligation of such lending institution and shall bear such date or dates, shall mature at the time or times, shall be subject to prepayment, and shall contain such other provisions consistent with this Code section as the authority shall determine;

(2) The interest rate or rates and other terms of such loans made from the proceeds of any issue of bonds of the authority shall be at least sufficient to assure the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon as the same become due;

(3) The authority may require that such loans shall be secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of collateral security in such amounts as the authority shall determine to be necessary to assure the payment of such loans and the interest thereon as the same become due. Such collateral security may consist of:

(A) Obligations for the payment of money by or guaranteed by the United States of America;

(B) Obligations for the payment of money by any of the following: the Bank for Cooperatives, the Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, the Federal Home Loan Bank System, the Export-Import Bank, the Federal Land Banks, the Federal National Mortgage Association, or the Government National Mortgage Association;

(C) Obligations for the payment of money by the state or any municipal corporation therein;

(D) Mortgages insured by the Federal Housing Administration or guaranteed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and such other mortgages insured or guaranteed by the federal government or by a private insurer as to payment of principal and interest as shall be approved by the authority;

(E) Conventional mortgages approved by the authority; or

(F) Any other security determined by the authority to protect the interests of the authority and the bondholders;

(4) The authority may require that collateral for such loans be deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution acceptable to the authority located in the state and designated by the authority as custodian therefor. In the absence of such requirement and if required by the authority, each lending institution shall enter into an agreement with the authority containing such provisions as the authority shall deem necessary to:

(A) Identify adequately and maintain such collateral;

(B) Service such collateral; and

(C) Require the lending institution to hold such collateral as an agent for the authority and be accountable to the authority as the trustee of an express trust for the application and disposition thereof and the income therefrom. The authority may also establish such additional requirements as it shall deem necessary with respect to the pledging, assigning, setting aside, or holding of such collateral and the making of substitutions therefor or additions thereto and the disposition of income and receipts therefrom;

(5) The authority shall require as a condition of each loan to a lending institution that such lending institution, within such period after receipt of the loan proceeds as the authority may prescribe by regulation, shall have entered into written commitments to make and, within such period thereafter as the authority may prescribe by regulation, shall have disbursed the net loan proceeds in mortgage loans on residential housing in an aggregate principal amount equal to the net amount of such loan proceeds. Such mortgage loans shall have such terms and conditions as the authority may prescribe;

(6) The authority shall require each lending institution to which the authority has made a loan to submit evidence satisfactory to the authority of the making of new mortgage loans for residential housing as required by this Code section and in connection therewith may, through its employees or agents, inspect the books and records of any such lending institution;

(7) Compliance by any lending institution with the terms of its agreement with or undertaking to the authority with respect to the making of mortgage loans for residential housing may be enforced by the decree of any court of competent jurisdiction;

(8) To the extent that any provisions of this subsection may be inconsistent with any provision of law of the state governing the affairs of lending institutions, the provisions of this subsection shall control.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, each authority may finance residential housing under any provision of this chapter for occupancy by persons who, by virtue of age, physical condition, or other appropriate factors, are determined by the authority to require the assistance provided by such authority under this chapter, without regard to personal or family income.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 6; Ga. L. 1980, p. 556, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985 and in 1987, semicolons were substituted for periods at the end of paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(7).

36-41-7. Purchase of mortgages or security interests or participations therein.

Statute text

(a) With respect to the power to purchase mortgages or security interests or participations therein from lending institutions as set forth in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-41-5, each authority may purchase mortgages or security interests from lending institutions, which shall in turn reinvest the proceeds in new mortgage loans made as rapidly as possible on residential housing. A mortgage or security interest or participation therein shall not be acquired under this chapter unless the rate of interest on such mortgage meets the rates of interest established by the authority. The authority shall establish such rates of interest, taking into consideration all of the following:

(1) The cost to the authority in obtaining funds;

(2) Allowances to be made to a lending institution as a service fee in acting as a servicing agent in the administration and collection of the mortgage;

(3) Administrative costs of the authority;

(4) Allowances for any necessary reserves of the authority; and

(5) Regulations of the Internal Revenue Service of the United States.

(b) The authority may purchase participations in mortgages or security interests and shall make such rules as will adequately secure the authority and its bondholders with respect to the purchase of participations in mortgages or security interests.

(c) If the authority purchases a mortgage or a security interest or a participation therein from a lending institution, the lending institution may act as servicing agent for the authority in the collection and administration of the mortgage or security interest, subject to the rules established by the authority under this chapter.

(d) Subject to the rights of bondholders, the authority shall fix the amount of the fee to be paid a servicing agent, in such amount as shall reasonably compensate the servicing agent for performing such services. The amount of such fee may be deductible from any interest payable and collected under the mortgage or security interest.

(e) The authority may make commitments to lending institutions to purchase a mortgage or security interest or participation therein prior to the date of its execution, and a mortgage which is made by a lending institution under a prior commitment from the authority to purchase the mortgage or security interest or a participation therein shall satisfy the requirement to reinvest the proceeds from the sale as quickly as possible in mortgage loans for residential housing. The authority shall establish such fees as are necessary to reimburse the authority for the administrative costs incurred in connection with making commitments to purchase and in purchasing mortgages or security interests or participations therein.

(f) The authority may require as a condition of a purchase of any mortgage or security interest from a lending institution that the lending institution represent and warrant to the authority any or all of the following:

(1) The unpaid principal balance and the interest rate thereon have been accurately stated to the authority and that the interest rate and all service charges in connection therewith are not usurious under the laws of the state;

(2) The amount of the unpaid principal balance is legally and validly due and owing;

(3) The lending institution has no notice of the existence of any counterclaim, offset, or defense asserted by the mortgagor or his successor in interest;

(4) Necessary documents have been properly recorded in the county in which the real estate lies;

(5) The mortgage or security interest constitutes a valid lien on the property described in the mortgage or security interest, subject only to such matters which do not adversely affect to a material degree the use or value of the property;

(6) The loan when made was lawful under the laws of the state or under federal law or both, whichever governed the making of the loan, and would be lawful on the date of purchase by the authority if made by the lending institution on that date in the amount of the unpaid principal balance;

(7) The mortgagor is not now in default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest, escrow funds, real property taxes, or otherwise in the performance of the mortgagor's obligations under the mortgage or security interest and has not, to the knowledge of the lending institution, been in default in the performance of any such obligation for a period of longer than 60 days;

(8) The mortgage or security interest requires that the property described therein be covered by a valid and subsisting policy of insurance issued by a responsible insurance company legally licensed and authorized to conduct and transact business in the state and providing fire and extended coverage to an amount not less than 80 percent of the insurable value of the property or in the amount of the mortgage or security interest, whichever the authority may determine;

(9) The insurance coverage referred to in paragraph (8) of this subsection is in full force and effect; and

(10) Subject to subsection (e) of this Code section, moneys received from the authority will be utilized for the financing, acquisition, or rehabilitation of residential housing within the geographic boundaries of the municipality activating the authority, and that certification by the lending institution to the effect that moneys have been reloaned as set forth in this chapter will be filed with the authority pursuant to the rules of the authority and will be available to the members of the public and to members of the General Assembly.

(g) Each lending institution shall be liable to the authority for any damages suffered by the authority by reason of the untruth of any representation or the breach of any warranty and, in the event that any representation shall prove to be untrue when made or in the event of any breach of warranty, the lending institution shall, at the option of the authority, repurchase the mortgage or security interest or participation for the original purchase price adjusted for amounts subsequently paid thereon, as the authority may determine.

(h) The authority may require the recording of an assignment of any mortgage purchased by it from a lending institution.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 556, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, § 6; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, § 7.)

36-41-8. Issuance of revenue bonds; use and commitment of funds; form and contents of bonds; execution; sale; temporary bonds; refunding bonds; trust indenture; validation of bonds; bonds as authorized investments.

Statute text

(a) Each authority shall have the power and is authorized, at one time or from time to time, to issue its revenue bonds in such principal amounts as, in the opinion of the authority, shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving the corporate purposes thereof, including the making and purchasing of loans for the acquisition, financing, construction, and rehabilitation of residential housing as provided in this chapter; the payment of interest on bonds of the authority; the establishment of reserves to secure such bonds; and all other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers.

(b) The authority may retain the services of a qualified, independent financial advisor. The financial advisor shall not in any manner be involved in the underwriting of the revenue bonds or in the origination, sale, or servicing of mortgage loans for residential housing and shall serve only to advise the authority.

(c) The bonds of each issue shall be dated; shall bear interest at such rate or rates as shall be set by the authority (which may include the use of any formula or market-pricing mechanism determined by the authority to be reasonable), without limitation by any existing law of the state, payable at such times as the authority may determine; shall mature at such time or times as the authority may determine; shall be payable in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority; and, at the option of the authority, may be made redeemable before maturity or exchangeable for other bonds of the same series at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution or financing documents providing for the issuance of such bonds or both redeemable and exchangeable. The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds with or without mandatory sinking fund provisions or as a combination thereof.

(d) The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest or principal coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company inside or outside the state.

(e) All such bonds shall be executed in the name of the authority by the chairman or vice-chairman and secretary-treasurer of the authority and shall be sealed with the official seal of the authority or a facsimile thereof. Coupons shall be executed in the name of the authority by the chairman or vice-chairman of the authority. The facsimile signature of both the chairman or vice-chairman and the secretary-treasurer of the authority may be imprinted in lieu of the manual signatures if the authority so directs, and the facsimile of the chairman's or vice-chairman's signature shall be used on such coupons. Bonds and interest coupons appurtenant thereto bearing the manual or facsimile signature of a person in office at the time such signature was signed or imprinted shall be fully valid notwithstanding the fact that before or after the delivery thereof such person ceased to hold such office. In addition to the foregoing, the bonds shall bear the manual or facsimile signature of the clerk of the superior court of each county wherein is located a municipality activating an authority.

(f) The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest. The authority may sell such bonds at public or private sale in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the authority.

(g) Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost. Such revenue bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this chapter.

(h) Each authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issue of refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under this chapter and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturities and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by this chapter insofar as the same may be applicable.

(i) If the authority so determines, the bonds may be issued pursuant to a trust indenture between the authority and a trustee, which trust indenture shall have such terms and provisions as may be determined by the authority.

(j) Except as provided in this Code section, all revenue bonds issued by the authority under this chapter shall be executed, confirmed, and validated under, and in accordance with, Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title, except that, in lieu of specifying the maturities or the rate or rates of interest which revenue bonds to be issued by an authority are to bear, the petition and complaint filed in the validation proceeding may state that the bonds, when issued, will mature no later than 40 years from their issuance and bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest specified in such notices or that, in the event that bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate specified in the notices; provided, however, that nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in such notices.

(k) In the event that no appeal is filed within the time prescribed by law or, if an appeal is filed, that the judgment is affirmed on appeal, the judgment of the superior court so confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds and the security therefor shall be forever conclusive upon the validity of the bonds and the security therefor against the authority and all other persons.

(l) The bonds are made securities in which all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities; all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities for any purposes of which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 8; Ga. L. 1980, p. 556, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, § 7; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 1986, p. 947, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, § 8.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Revenue bonds generally, § 36-82-60 et seq.

36-41-9. Pledge of assets for payment of bonds.

Statute text

Each authority may pledge for the payment of its bonds such assets, funds, contract rights, and properties as the resolution providing for the issuance of its bonds may provide. Any such pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The moneys or properties so pledged shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. No resolution or any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, § 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, § 9.)

36-41-10. Bonds or obligations not public debt.

Statute text

No bonds or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by any authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision thereof, nor shall any act of any authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of the state or any such county, municipality, or political subdivision. All such bonds and obligations shall be payable solely from the sources established for the payment thereof in the resolution or financing documents authorizing the issuance of such bonds; and no holder or holders of any such bonds or obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision thereof, nor to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or any such county, municipality, or political subdivision.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 11; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, § 9; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, § 10.)

36-41-11. Tax exemptions.

Statute text

As each authority will be performing essential governmental functions in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter, the state covenants with the holders of the bonds of an authority that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of any facilities maintained or acquired by it or any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such facilities or other income received by the authority and that the bonds and notes of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The exemption from taxation provided in this Code section shall not extend to tenants or lessees of the authority and shall not include exemptions from sales and use taxes on property purchased by the authority or for use by the authority. No authority shall be required to pay any intangible tax on the recording of any mortgage held or granted by the authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, § 10; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, § 11.)

36-41-12. Competition with Georgia Housing and Finance Authority.

Statute text

No authority shall compete with the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority to such an extent as to affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of bonds issued by the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 12; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-3.)

36-41-13. Annual audit.

Statute text

Each authority and each trustee acting on behalf of an authority shall submit to an annual independent audit performed by a qualified firm selected by the members of such authority. Payment for this audit shall be paid from any funds held by the trustee for the authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1530, § 6.)

——————————

CHAPTER 42

DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES

Sec.

36-42-1. Short title.

36-42-2. Legislative purpose.

36-42-3. Definitions.

36-42-4. Creation of authorities; appointment and terms of directors; quorum.

36-42-5. Activation of authority by resolution; filing of resolution with Secretary of State and Department of Community Affairs; comments by Department of Community Affairs.

36-42-6. Action by resolution subsequent to activating authority.

36-42-7. Qualifications and reimbursement of directors; election of officers; training.

36-42-8. Powers of authorities generally.

36-42-8.1. Eminent domain by municipality or authority [Repealed].

36-42-9. Revenue bonds generally.

36-42-10. Applicability of "Revenue Bond Law"; form and provisions for exchange and transfer of bonds; certificate of validation; specification of interest rates in notice to district attorney or Attorney General.

36-42-11. Agreements and instruments of authority generally; use of proceeds; subsequent issues; bond anticipation notes.

36-42-12. Obligations of authorities not public debt of state or political subdivision thereof.

36-42-13. Constitutional authority for enactment of chapter; tax exemption.

36-42-14. Effect of chapter on other public authorities.

36-42-15. Construction of chapter; applicability of the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008."

36-42-16. Creation of special districts.

36-42-17. Assessments under Code Section 36-42-16; priority of liens regarding assessments for downtown development authorities.

Annotations

Cross references. - Development authorities generally, T. 42, C. 62.

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986). For survey article on construction law, see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 125 (1992).

For note, "Procedural requirements for public approval of tax-exempt industrial development bonds under TEFRA," see 19 Ga. St. B. J. 84 (1982).

36-42-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter may be referred to as the "Downtown Development Authorities Law."

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1744, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Underground Atlanta is a public works. - Underground Atlanta was constructed under the Downtown Development Authorities Act and is a proper project under the Downtown Development Authorities Act; accordingly, the Underground Atlanta project falls within the definition of "project" in O.C.G.A. § 36-42-3(6) and the totality of the agreements between the city and Underground Festival, Inc., clearly contemplates a public works project. City of Atlanta v. United Elec. Co., 202 Ga. App. 239, 414 S.E.2d 251 (1991).

36-42-2. Legislative purpose.

Statute text

The revitalization and redevelopment of the central business districts of the municipal corporations of this state develop and promote for the public good and general welfare trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities and promote the general welfare of this state by creating a climate favorable to the location of new industry, trade, and commerce and the development of existing industry, trade, and commerce within the municipal corporations of this state. Revitalization and redevelopment of central business districts by financing projects under this chapter will develop and promote for the public good and general welfare trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities and will promote the general welfare of this state. It is, therefore, in the public interest and is vital to the public welfare of the people of this state, and it is declared to be the public purpose of this chapter, so to revitalize and redevelop the central business districts of the municipal corporations of this state. No bonds, notes, or other obligations, except refunding bonds, shall be issued by an authority under this chapter unless its board of directors adopts a resolution finding that the project for which such bonds, notes, or other obligations are to be issued will promote the foregoing objectives.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1744, § 9.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Clearance and rehabilitation of blighted areas, T. 8, C. 4.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Scope of application. - Although the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" expands the scope of permissible authority projects beyond that of the "Development Authorities Law" to include all types of commercial projects, the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" otherwise resembles the "Development Authorities Law" in design and purpose. Odom v. Union City Downtown Dev. Auth., 251 Ga. 248, 305 S.E.2d 110 (1983).

Neither the increased breadth of the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" in comparison with the uniform industrial development authority statutes which preceded it, nor the apparently broad language of the enacting and definitions clauses therein, are sufficiently definite indications that the General Assembly intended to undertake a radical departure from its previous cautious approach and grant local governments unbridled power to finance all their public works through downtown development authorities. Odom v. Union City Downtown Dev. Auth., 251 Ga. 248, 305 S.E.2d 110 (1983).

Street and government-building construction. - Municipality's attempt to use the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" to finance street improvements and construction and refurbishing of governmental buildings is unconstitutional. Odom v. Union City Downtown Dev. Auth., 251 Ga. 248, 305 S.E.2d 110 (1983).

36-42-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Authority" means each public body corporate and politic created pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Cost of the project" or "cost of any project" means and includes:

(A) All costs of acquisition (by purchase or otherwise), construction, assembly, installation, modification, renovation, or rehabilitation incurred in connection with any project or any part of any project;

(B) All costs of real property, fixtures, or personal property used in or in connection with or necessary for any project or for any facilities related thereto, including, but not limited to, the cost of all land, estates for years, easements, rights, improvements, water rights, connections for utility services, fees, franchises, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates; the cost of securing any such franchises, permits, approvals, licenses, or certificates; and the cost of preparation of any application therefor and the cost of all fixtures, machinery, equipment, furniture, and other property used in or in connection with or necessary for any project;

(C) All financing charges and loan fees and all interest on revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations of an authority which accrues or is paid prior to and during the period of construction of a project and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary to place such project in operation;

(D) All costs of engineering, surveying, and architectural and legal services and all expenses incurred by engineers, surveyors, architects, and attorneys in connection with any project;

(E) All expenses for inspection of any project;

(F) All fees of fiscal agents, paying agents, and trustees for bondholders under any trust agreement, indenture of trust, or similar instrument or agreement; all expenses incurred by any such fiscal agents, paying agents, and trustees; and all other costs and expenses incurred relative to the issuance of any revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations for any project;

(G) All fees of any type charged by an authority in connection with any project;

(H) All expenses of or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of any project;

(I) All costs of plans and specifications for any project;

(J) All costs of title insurance and examinations of title with respect to any project;

(K) Repayment of any loans made for the advance payment of any part of any of the foregoing costs, including interest thereon and any other expenses of such loans;

(L) Administrative expenses of the authority and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to any project or the financing thereof or the placing of any project in operation; and

(M) The establishment of a fund or funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, or such other funds or reserves as the authority may approve with respect to the financing and operation of any project and as may be authorized by any bond resolution, trust agreement, indenture of trust, or similar instrument or agreement pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority may be authorized.

Any cost, obligation, or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of proceeds of revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority.

(3) "Downtown development area" means the geographical area within a municipal corporation designated as such by the resolution of the governing body activating the authority for such municipal corporation as modified by any subsequent resolution of the governing body of such municipal corporation.

(4) "Governing body" means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of any municipal corporation in the State of Georgia.

(5) "Municipal corporation" means any city or town in this state.

(6) "Project" means:

(A) The acquisition, construction, installation, modification, renovation, or rehabilitation of land, interests in land, buildings, structures, facilities, or other improvements located or to be located within the downtown development area, and the acquisition, installation, modification, renovation, rehabilitation, or furnishing of fixtures, machinery, equipment, furniture, or other property of any nature whatsoever used on, in, or in connection with any such land, interest in land, building, structure, facility, or other improvement, any undertaking authorized by Chapter 43 of this title as part of a city business improvement district, any undertaking authorized in Chapter 44 of this title, the "Redevelopment Powers Law," when the downtown development authority has been designated as a redevelopment agency, or any undertaking authorized in Chapter 61 of this title, the "Urban Redevelopment Law," when the downtown development authority has been designated as an urban redevelopment agency, all for the essential public purpose of the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities in its authorized area of operation; and

(B) The provision of financing to property owners for the purpose of installing or modifying improvements to their property in order to reduce the energy or water consumption on such property or to install an improvement to such property that produces energy from renewable resources.

A project may be for any industrial, commercial, business, office, parking, public, or other use, provided that a majority of the members of the authority determine, by a duly adopted resolution, that the project and such use thereof would further the public purpose of this chapter. Such term shall include any one or more buildings or structures used or to be used as a not for profit hospital, not for profit skilled nursing home, or not for profit intermediate care home subject to regulation and licensure by the Department of Community Health and all necessary, convenient, or related interests in land, machinery, apparatus, appliances, equipment, furnishings, appurtenances, site preparation, landscaping, and physical amenities.

(7) "Revenue bonds" or "bonds" means any bonds of an authority which are authorized to be issued under the Constitution and laws of Georgia, including refunding bonds but not including notes or other obligations of an authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1744, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1463, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 36; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-34/SB 433; Ga. L. 2010, p. 261, § 1/HB 1388.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a comma was added following "licenses" near the end of subparagraph (2)(B).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Scope of application. - Although the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" expands the scope of permissible authority projects beyond that of the "Development Authorities Law" to include all types of commercial projects, the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" otherwise resembles the "Development Authorities Law" in design and purpose. Odom v. Union City Downtown Dev. Auth., 251 Ga. 248, 305 S.E.2d 110 (1983).

Neither the increased breadth of the "Downtown Development Authorities Law" in comparison with the uniform industrial development authority statutes which preceded that law, nor the apparently broad language of the enacting and definitions clauses therein, are sufficiently definite indications that the General Assembly intended to undertake a radical departure from the General Assembly's previous cautious approach and grant local governments unbridled power to finance all local public works through downtown development authorities. Odom v. Union City Downtown Dev. Auth., 251 Ga. 248, 305 S.E.2d 110 (1983).
